Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-832
Supplemental, general provisions of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the law of real property and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of sections 76-825 to 76-894, except to the extent inconsistent with sections 76-825 to 76-894.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 8.